Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3214
Real estate investment trust; articles
of agreement or trust; filing.

A real estate investment trust
shall file its articles of agreement or of trust or any modifications thereof
with the Secretary of State and with the county clerk of the county in this
state in which the trust has its principal place of doing business by complying
with the same procedures as set forth in sections 21-215, 21-219 to 21-225, and 21-2,150
to 21-2,160. Such filing shall include a copy of the articles
of agreement or of trust and shall name a resident agent in the State of Nebraska
and the principal place of doing business in this state.

Laws 1961, c. 108, § 2, p. 345;

Laws 1965, c. 114, § 1, p. 439;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-633;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 213;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 278.